Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.105

Disclosure of information—Exceptions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1287.SL) ***

A person licensed under this chapter shall not disclose the written acknowledgment of the disclosure statement pursuant to RCW 18.225.100, nor any information acquired from persons consulting the individual in a professional capacity when the information was necessary to enable the individual to render professional services to those persons except:

(1) With the written authorization of that person or, in the case of death or disability, the person's personal representative;

(2) If the person waives the privilege by bringing charges against the person licensed under this chapter;

(3) In response to a subpoena from the secretary. The secretary may subpoena only records related to a complaint or report under RCW 18.130.050;

(4) As required under chapter 26.44 or 74.34 RCW or RCW 71.05.217 (6) and (7); or

(5) To any individual if the person licensed under this chapter reasonably believes that disclosure will avoid or minimize an imminent danger to the health or safety of the individual or any other individual; however, there is no obligation on the part of the provider to so disclose.

[2020 c 302 s 115; 2005 c 504 s 707; 2003 c 204 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Severability—Application—Construction—Captions, part headings, subheadings not law—Adoption of rules—Effective dates—2005 c 504: See notes following RCW 71.05.027.

Alphabetization—Correction of references—2005 c 504: See note following RCW 71.05.020.

Licensees under chapter 18.225 RCW—Subject to chapter 70.02 RCW: RCW 70.02.180.